Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 18a. new text end new text begin Residual amount. new text end new text begin "Residual amount" means an amount of a controlled substance that is not usable, regardless of whether the amount could produce a pharmacological or physiological effect. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date and, notwithstanding any statutory or common law to the contrary, applies retroactively to crimes committed before that date. new text end